Utah statutes.
63E-1-304.   Limitations on risk management coverage.

(1)  Except as specifically modified in its authorizing statute, an independent entity is not eligible to receive coverage under the Risk Management Fund created by Section 63A-4-201.

(2)  If an independent entity that receives coverage under the Risk Management Fund is involved in a commercial activity, the state risk manager may require that the entity:

(a)  procure commercial insurance coverage or provide proof of vendor's insurance coverage for the commercial activity; and

(b)  comply with loss prevention measures specified by the state risk manager.



Enacted by Chapter 220, 2013 General Session

